Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB42.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Due to the economic impact of intercollegiate athletics within the Commonwealth
and the United States, the General Assembly finds that certain regular
intercollegiate athletic competitions among the Commonwealth's public
universities enhance the profiles of these publicly supported programs and
promote economic activity within the Commonwealth.
(2) Each academic year, both the University of Louisville and the University of
Kentucky shall endeavor to play against the public postsecondary institutions of
Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State
University, Murray State University, Northern Kentucky University, and Western
Kentucky University in multiple sports.
(3) At a minimum, and during each academic year in which they field a team, the
University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville shall compete in an
intercollegiate sporting event against each other consisting of at least:
(a) One (1) sanctioned game of varsity-level football; and
(b) One (1) sanctioned game of varsity-level basketball for each of the men's
and women's teams to occur on or between December 14 and January 6.
(4) At a minimum, both the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville
shall each play:
(a) Within a period of two (2) academic years, one (1) sanctioned game of
varsity-level football against one (1) other Kentucky public postsecondary
institution; and
(b) During each academic year, two (2) sanctioned games of varsity-level
basketball for each of the men's and women's teams against at least two (2)
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/5/2026 10:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 482
other Kentucky public postsecondary institutions.
(5) A game scheduled to satisfy any requirement of subsection (3) or (4) of this
section may be subsequently postponed or cancelled due to or resulting from, in
whole or in part, acts or events beyond the control of the institutions, including
but not limited to acts of God, natural disasters, epidemics, strikes or other labor
disruptions, war, civil disturbances, riots, or complete or partial disruptions of
facilities. A game that is postponed and completed or a game that is cancelled
under this subsection shall satisfy any requirement of subsection (3) or (4) of this
section for the academic year.
Section 2. Notwithstanding Section 1 of this Act, if Section 1 of this Act would
violate any contract entered into by the University of Kentucky, the University of
Louisville, Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State
University, Murray State University, Northern Kentucky University, or Western
Kentucky University prior to this Act becoming law, then Section 1 of this Act shall not
be enforceable during the academic year governing that contract.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/5/2026 10:59 AM Jacketed